Hawaii statutes.
§302A-602 Teachers; licenses and
certificates. (a) No person shall serve as a teacher in the department
without first having obtained a license from the Hawaii teacher standards board
in such form as the Hawaii teacher standards board determines. The department
shall establish types of certificates in the educational field and the
requirements to qualify for those certificates issued to individuals who are
not required to obtain a license pursuant to sections 302A-801 to 302A-808.

(b) Beginning with the 2002-2003 school year,
no person paid under the salary schedule contained in the unit 5 collective
bargaining agreement shall serve as a teacher in the department without first
having obtained a license pursuant to sections 302A-801 to 302A-808 from the
Hawaii teacher standards board in such form as the Hawaii teacher standards
board determines.

(c) Beginning with the 2002-2003 school year,
the department may employ unlicensed individuals as emergency hires pursuant to
sections 302A-801 to 302A-808. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2 and am c 122, §§2, 7; am
L 1999, c 218, §4; am L 2001, c 312, §§4, 11; am L 2002, c 193, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next